Maryland, session 2026, HB0722.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–117.
(a) In this section, “sexual abuse” means any act that involves:
(1) An adult allowing or encouraging a child to engage in:
(i) Obscene photography, films, poses, or similar activity;
(ii) Pornographic photography, films, poses, or similar activity; or
(iii) Prostitution;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0722*

HOUSE BILL 722
(2) Incest;
(3) Rape;
(4) Sexual offense in any degree; or
(5) Any other sexual conduct that is a crime.
(b) Except as provided under subsection (d) of this section and notwithstanding
any time limitation under a statute of limitations, a statute of repose, the Maryland Tort
Claims Act, the Local Government Tort Claims Act, or any other law, an action for damages
arising out of a claim or claims of sexual abuse that occurred while the victim was a minor
may be filed at any time.
(c) Except as provided in §§ 5–303 and 5–518 of this title and § 12–104 of the
State Government Article, the total amount of noneconomic damages that may be awarded
under this section to a single claimant in an action against a single defendant for injuries
arising from a claim or claims that would have been barred by a time limitation before
October 1, 2023, may not exceed:
(1) For an action filed on or before May 31, 2025, $1,500,000; and
(2) For an action filed on or after June 1, 2025, $700,000.
(d) No action for damages that would have been barred by a time limitation before
October 1, 2023, may be brought under this section if the alleged victim of abuse is deceased
at the commencement of the action.
(e) In any action for damages filed on or after June 1, 2025, arising out of a claim
or claims of sexual abuse that occurred while the claimant was a minor, counsel may not
charge or receive fees that exceed:
(1) 20% of the settlement; or
(2) 25% of the judgment.
(F) AN ORGANIZATION IS NOT IMMUNE FROM LIABILITY IN ANY ACTION FOR
DAMAGES ARISING OUT OF A CLAIM OR CLAIMS OF SEXUAL ABUSE THAT OCCURRED
WHILE THE CLAIMANT WAS A MINOR ON THE GROUNDS THAT THE ORGANIZATION IS
A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the General
Assembly to abrogate the doctrine of charitable immunity in any action for damages arising
out of a claim or claims of sexual abuse that occurred while the claimant was a minor.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any action for damages

HOUSE BILL 722 3
arising out of a claim or claims of sexual abuse that occurred while the claimant was a
minor, whether the action is pending, concluded, dismissed, or arising before the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.